Florida, session 2026, SB288.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 9 10 Section 1.âSection 425.041, Florida Statutes, is amended to 11 read: 12 425.041âProhibited fees, bylaws, tariffs, and policies.âA 13 cooperative which sells electricity at retail may not adopt, 14 enact, or enforce any fee, including a lot fee, developer fee, 15 or surcharge, or any bylaw, tariff, or policy, or take any other 16 action, that restricts or prohibits or has the effect of 17 restricting or prohibiting: 18 (1)âThe types or fuel sources of energy production which 19 may be used, delivered, converted, or supplied by the entities 20 listed in s. 366.032(1) to serve customers that such entities 21 are authorized to serve. 22 (2)âThe use of an appliance, including a stove or grill, 23 which uses the types or fuel sources of energy production which 24 may be used, delivered, converted, or supplied by the entities 25 listed in s. 366.032(1). As used in this subsection, the term 26 âapplianceâ means a device or apparatus manufactured and 27 designed to use energy and for which the Florida Building Code 28 or the Florida Fire Prevention Code provides specific 29 requirements. 30 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.